Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.571

Notice of intent to establish branch—Another state or foreign jurisdiction.

A credit union desiring to establish a branch in another state or a foreign jurisdiction shall submit to the director a notice of intent to establish the branch at least thirty days before conducting business at the branch.

[ 2001 c 83 s 31; 1997 c 397 s 51; 1994 c 92 s 190; 1984 c 31 s 23. Formerly RCW 31.12.215.]